Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 14 Nomination of Party and Independent Candidates

17-14-1.
Declarations of candidacy.

During the last consecutive Monday, Tuesday, and Wednesday in June in the even years and during the thirty-ninth (39th) and fortieth (40th) days preceding a primary election for a special election, or for an election regularly scheduled for a time other than the biennial general statewide election, each voter desiring to be a candidate at the upcoming primary or an independent candidate on final nomination papers shall, on a form that shall be provided by the secretary of state, file a declaration of his or her candidacy not later than four (4:00) p.m. of the last day for the filing with the secretary of state for congressional and statewide general offices, or with the local board of the place of the candidate’s voting residence for general assembly, or state committee or senatorial and representative district committee or with the appropriate local board for local officers. The declaration shall be signed by the candidate as his or her name appears on the voting list. The signature shall be accepted as valid if it can be reasonably identified to be the name and signature of the voter it purports to be. A variation of the voter’s signature by the insertion or omission of identifying titles or by the substitution of initials for the first or middle names of both shall not in itself be grounds for invalidation of the signature. The declaration shall also include the following information:

The candidate’s name as it appears on the voting list, subject to the same provisions as relate to the voter’s signature on the declaration;

The address as it appears on the voting list, provided that an address which is substantially the same as the address on the voting list shall be valid;

The party declaration if seeking to run in a party primary;

The office sought;

The place and date of birth;

The length of residence in the state and in the town or city where he or she resides;

A certification that he or she is neither serving a sentence, including probation or parole, for which he or she was imprisoned upon final conviction of a felony imposed on any date nor serving any sentence, whether incarcerated or suspended, on probation or parole, upon final conviction of a felony committed after November 5, 1986;

A certification that he or she has not been lawfully adjudicated to be non compos mentis, of unsound mind;

In the case of candidates for party nomination, a certification that he or she has not been a member of a political party other than the declared party within ninety (90) days of the filing date; and

If a person is a candidate for a state or local office, a certification that the person has not within the preceding three (3) years served any sentence, incarcerated or suspended, on probation or parole, for a crime committed after November 5, 1986, upon a plea of nolo contendere or guilty or upon a conviction of a felony or for a misdemeanor for which a sentence of imprisonment for six (6) months or more, whether suspended or to be served as imposed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 7; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 6; P.L. 1953, ch. 3202, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 70, § 3; P.L. 1974, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 372, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 293, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 6; P.L. 1989, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 395, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 194, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 277, § 2.

17-14-1.1.
Party affiliation.

Whenever any person seeks elective office, that person shall not have been a member of a political party other than the declared political party within ninety (90) days of the filing of his or her declaration of candidacy.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 372, § 3.

17-14-1.2.
Candidate required to be a qualified voter in the election.

No person shall be eligible to file a declaration of candidacy as an independent candidate nor shall a person be eligible to be a candidate or be eligible to be voted for unless the person shall, at the time of filing the declaration, be qualified to vote in the election within the district for the office which that person seeks.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, individuals residing in state senate districts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 14, 15, 16 and 17 may file a declaration of candidacy for state senator and/or senatorial district committee member for those senate districts for the 2004 election pursuant to §

17-14-1

, provided they were registered to vote in the election for that district on or before June 16, 2004.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 9; P.L. 2004, ch. 24, § 1.

17-14-2.
Candidate required to be a qualified voter in the primary.

No person shall be eligible to file a declaration of candidacy, or be eligible to be a candidate or be eligible to be voted for or to be nominated or elected in a party primary unless the person, at the time of filing the declaration, is qualified to vote in a primary within the district for the office which he or she seeks.

No person shall be eligible to file a declaration of candidacy, or be eligible to be a candidate or eligible to be voted for or to be nominated or elected in any party primary or general election if that person has declared to be a candidate for another elected public office, either state, local or both.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, individuals residing in state senate districts 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 14, 15, 16 and 17 may file a declaration of candidacy for state senator and/or senatorial district committee member for those senate districts for the 2004 election pursuant to §

17-14-1

, provided they were registered to vote in the election for that district on or before June 16, 2004.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 7; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 24, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 347, § 1.

Party Affiliation.

The 1968 amendment deleted the restriction on candidacy to voter eligibility in the primary of the same political party leaving only the requirements of age, citizenship, and residence to be a qualified elector for office as set forth in the state constitution. Yale v. Curvin, 345 F. Supp. 447, 1972 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12717 (D.R.I. 1972).

17-14-2.1.
Party candidates not eligible for independent nomination and independent candidates not eligible for party nomination.

No person who has filed a declaration of candidacy as an independent candidate pursuant to §

17-14-1

for an office for which a party candidate may be nominated pursuant to this chapter shall be eligible to file a declaration of candidacy as a party candidate for the same office or for any other public office in the same election year, and no person who has filed a declaration of candidacy as a party candidate pursuant to §

17-14-1

for an office for which an independent candidate may be nominated pursuant to this chapter shall be eligible to file a declaration of candidacy as an independent candidate for the same office or for any other public office in the same election year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 404, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 8; P.L. 1997, ch. 184, § 1.

17-14-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 7; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 9; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 9; Repealed by P.L. 2005, ch. 347, § 2, effective July 19, 2005.

17-14-4.
Preparation of nomination papers for candidates — Combination of endorsed candidates — Furnishing of nomination papers to candidates.

Upon receipt of the declarations referred to in §

17-14-1

, within two (2) business days of the final date for filing endorsements, the secretary of state for statewide candidates and the local board for general assembly and local candidates shall prepare nomination papers for each person who has filed a declaration of candidacy as provided in §

17-14-1

. A minimum of three (3) sets of nomination papers shall be prepared for each candidate whose name appears on nomination papers containing the name of a candidate for general assembly and for local office. Nomination papers for voters from the city of Providence for the offices enumerated in § 17-14-1 shall be furnished by the secretary of state. Nomination papers shall be prepared with the name of the candidate as it appears on the voting list, notwithstanding that the candidate may have signed his or her declaration of candidacy other than as the candidate’s name appears on the voting list. Candidates for nomination for different offices endorsed by the appropriate committee on any party shall be combined on the same nomination papers. The names of candidates for different offices not endorsed by the appropriate committee of any party shall not be combined on the same nomination papers. Nomination papers for candidates for general assembly shall be furnished by the local board of the general assembly candidate. Nomination papers shall be furnished to the local boards by the secretary of state and each shall bear the imprint of the state coat of arms and any additional language required by law. Nomination papers shall be appropriately marked or color coded to indicate the different political parties, the endorsed and unendorsed candidates of those parties, and independent candidates.

General assembly and local candidates for nomination may, at their own expense, have nomination papers duplicated. The signatures obtained on the duplicated nomination papers shall be considered valid if, and only if, prior to any signatures being affixed, the duplicated nomination papers have been time stamped by the secretary of state or local board of canvassers which issued the original nomination papers.

Nomination papers furnished by the secretary of state shall be personally issued to the candidate, or in the case of combined nomination papers to one of the candidates, for whom they were prepared, or to an individual presenting written authorization from the candidate, or one of the candidates appearing on them, to receive the nomination papers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 8; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-4

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 8; P.L. 1988, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 389, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 324, § 1.

17-14-4.1.
Party committees — Nomination papers unnecessary.

In the case of endorsed candidates for membership on all party committees, including state, town, city, district, or ward committees, nomination papers shall not be necessary. In this case, the filing of the endorsed slate of candidates by the particular committee shall be sufficient to nominate the candidates. All nonendorsed candidates for membership on party committees shall be required to file declarations of candidacy and to obtain and file nomination papers in the same manner as other candidates for primary election.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 9.

17-14-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 8; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-5

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 70, § 3; P.L. 1962, ch. 191, § 2; P.L. 1974, ch. 36, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 7, effective June 1, 1988.

17-14-6.
Statement at head of nomination papers.

At the head of the space on the nomination papers where voters are to endorse their approval of the candidates shall be printed the following:

“Each of the signers of this paper by so signing severally certifies that he or she is a voter in the area from and for which the endorsed candidate (or candidates) seek(s) to be elected.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 8; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 7; P.L. 1950, ch. 2553, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-6

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 388, § 1.

17-14-7.
Number of signers required for nomination papers.

United States senator or governor. The nomination papers of a candidate for the party nomination or an independent candidate for presidential elector, United States senator, or governor shall be signed, in the aggregate, by at least one thousand (1,000) voters. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for the 2020 election only, the nomination papers of a candidate for the party nomination or an independent candidate for United States senator shall be signed, in the aggregate, by at least five hundred (500) voters.

Representative in Congress. The nomination papers of a candidate for the party nomination or an independent candidate for representative in Congress shall be signed, in the aggregate, by at least five hundred (500) voters. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for the 2020 election only, the nomination papers of a candidate for the party nomination or an independent candidate for representative in Congress shall be signed, in the aggregate, by at least two hundred fifty (250) voters.

General state offices. The nomination papers of a candidate for the party nomination or an independent candidate for any of the general offices of the state, excluding governor, shall be signed, in the aggregate, by at least five hundred (500) voters.

State senator. The nomination papers of a candidate for a party nomination or independent candidate for senator in any senatorial district shall be signed, in the aggregate, by at least one hundred (100) voters of the senatorial district.

State representative. The nomination papers of a candidate for party nomination or an independent candidate for a member of the house of representatives from any representative district shall be signed, in the aggregate, by at least fifty (50) voters of the representative district.

City offices. The nomination papers of a candidate for party nomination or an independent candidate for any local office to be filled by the voters of any city at large shall be signed, in the aggregate, by at least two hundred (200) voters of the city, provided that in the city of Newport, for at-large candidates or candidates for school committee, at least one hundred (100) signatures shall be required; provided, further, that in the city of Woonsocket, for candidates for citywide nonpartisan office, including city council, mayor, and candidates for school committee, if elected, at least one hundred (100) signatures shall be required; and provided, further that in the city of Providence, at least five hundred (500) signatures shall be required.

Voting district moderator or clerk. The nomination papers for a candidate for voting district moderator or clerk in any town shall be signed, in the aggregate, by at least ten (10) voters of the voting district.

Other offices. The nomination papers of a candidate for party nomination for other offices covered by §

17-15-7

, or for the election of delegates or for unendorsed party committee candidates, shall be signed, in the aggregate, by fifty (50) voters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 9; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-7

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 10; P.L. 1982, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 8; P.L. 1988, ch. 435, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 7, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 8, § 2.

17-14-8.
Signing of nomination papers.

Not all endorsers of a candidate need sign on the same nomination papers, but endorsers who are voters in different cities and towns shall not sign the same sheet. Every voter signing a nomination paper shall sign in person with his or her name, place of residence, and street number, as it appears on the voting list. The signature shall be accepted as valid if it can be reasonably identified to be the signature of the voter it purports to be. A variation of the voter’s signature by the insertion or omission of identifying titles or by the substitution of initials for the first or middle names, or both, shall not in itself be grounds for invalidation of the signature. Any voter who is unable to write may sign by making his or her mark “X” on the nomination paper in the presence of two (2) witnesses who shall subscribe their names on the paper as witnesses to the signing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 10; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-8

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 271, § 1.

17-14-9.
Number of papers signed by same voter.

A voter may sign any number of nomination papers for any office the voter may lawfully vote for at the general election.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 10; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-9

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 271, § 2.

17-14-10.
Affidavit of person obtaining signatures.

Every person who obtains signatures of voters upon nomination papers shall under oath sign the following statement:

“I, , of , under oath, make affidavit and say that the signers of the within nomination paper (or papers) did so sign the paper (or papers) in my presence. State of Rhode Island , Sc. Subscribed and sworn to before me this day of , A.D. 20. Notary Public”

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 8; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-10

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

Form of Affidavit.

It is not error to add words other than those required by this section. Vlasaty v. State Bd. of Elections,

119 R.I. 52

, 376 A.2d 320,

1977 R.I. LEXIS 1870

(1977).

Affidavits which did not appear on the nomination papers themselves, but instead contained only handwritten notes specifying to which signature they referred, were sufficient. Vlasaty v. State Bd. of Elections,

119 R.I. 52

, 376 A.2d 320,

1977 R.I. LEXIS 1870

(1977).

17-14-11.
Checking and certification of nomination papers — Challenge.

Each nomination paper for party and independent candidates shall be submitted before four o’clock (4:00) p.m. on the sixtieth (60th) day before the primary to the local board of the city or town where the signers appear to be voters or, in the case of special elections, on the twenty-eighth (28th) day before the primary. Nomination papers for independent presidential candidates and presidential candidates of political parties, other than those defined in §

17-1-2(9)

, shall be filed not later than sixty (60) days prior to the general election. Each local board shall immediately proceed to check signatures on each nomination paper filed with it against the voting list as last canvassed or published according to law. The local boards shall certify a sufficient number of names appearing on the nomination papers that are in conformity with the requirements of §

17-14-8

to qualify the candidate for a position on the ballot, and after considering any challenge under this section and, if necessary, certifying any additional valid names, shall immediately file nomination papers for statewide office, general assembly, and state and district committee candidates with the secretary of state; provided, that nomination papers for local candidates shall be retained by the local board. If any candidate or the chairperson of any party committee questions the validity or authenticity of any signature on the nomination paper, the local board shall immediately and summarily decide the question, and for this purpose, shall have the same powers as are conferred upon the board by the provisions of §

17-14-14

. If any challenged signature is found to be invalid, for any reason in law, or forged, then the signature shall not be counted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 11; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-11

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 70, § 3; P.L. 1974, ch. 36, § 3; P.L. 1978, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 8; P.L. 1991, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 194, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 277, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 245, § 1.

17-14-12.
Filing of nomination papers.

All nomination papers for state offices or officers and all certified lists of candidates for local offices or officers shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state (the certified lists by the respective local boards), not later than fifty-four (54) days before the date of the primary held to nominate candidates for general election; but when there is a primary to nominate candidates for any office mentioned in §

17-15-7

to be voted upon at a special election, all nomination papers and lists of local candidates shall be filed in the office on or before the twenty-sixth (26th) day preceding the day of the special primary election. Nomination papers for independent presidential candidates and presidential candidates of political parties other than those defined in §

17-1-2(9)

shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state by the local boards of canvassers not later than fifty-four (54) days before the date of the election.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 12; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-12

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 70, § 3; P.L. 1974, ch. 36, § 4; P.L. 1978, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 8; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 75; P.L. 1991, ch. 194, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 277, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 247, § 1.

17-14-12.1.
Certification by local boards.

All certified lists of candidates for primary, regular, and special elections, as well as all local questions to be voted on at these elections shall be in final form when certified to the secretary of state by the local boards. In all instances where there needs to be a reprinting, remailing, or other procedure pertaining to the ballots for a community, except as provided in §

17-14-17

, the cost of the reprinting, remailing, or other procedure shall be borne by the local community.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 279, § 1.

17-14-13.
Objections to eligibility of candidate or sufficiency of papers.

When nomination papers have been duly filed and are in apparent conformity with §

17-14-11

, they shall be conclusively presumed to be valid, unless written objections to them are made as to the eligibility of the candidate or the sufficiency of the nomination papers or the signatures on them. All objections shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state or of the local board, as the case may be, by four o’clock (4:00) p.m. on the next business day after the last day fixed for filing nomination papers in the appropriate office as provided in this chapter. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the secretary of state or the local board, as the case may be, from disqualifying a candidate based on the determination of the secretary of state or the local board, acting on its own motion, that the candidate is ineligible or the nomination papers or the signatures on them are invalid or insufficient.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 13; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-13

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 172, § 22; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 1.

17-14-14.
Hearings on objections — Witnesses — Notice.

All objections to nomination papers which are required to be filed with the secretary of state shall be considered by the state board. The secretary of state shall, when requested by the state board, immediately deliver to the board the nomination papers to which objection has been filed. The state board may, at the hearing on the objections, summon witnesses, administer oaths, and require the production of books, papers, and documents. The witnesses shall be summoned in the same manner, be paid the same fees, and be subject to the same penalties for default as witnesses before the superior court. A summons may be sworn to and an oath may be administered by the board. When an objection has been filed, notice of the objection shall be immediately given by registered or certified mail or by personal service by the state board to the candidates, addressed to the residence of the candidate as given in the nomination papers, and to any party committee interested in the nomination to which objection is made.

Additional notice may also be given by the state board if it sees fit to do so. The decision of the board shall be rendered within two (2) days, exclusive of Sundays and holidays, after filing of objections and shall immediately be certified by the state board to the secretary of state.

All objections to nomination papers for other than state officers shall be considered by the local board in the same manner and with the same effect as provided in subsection (a) of this section for hearing of objections to nomination papers for state officers by the state board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 14; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3717, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-14

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 8.

17-14-15.
Withdrawal of candidacy.

A person nominated as a candidate to be voted for at a primary or an independent candidate may withdraw his or her name from the nomination prior to the date of primary by a request signed and duly acknowledged by him or her setting forth the reason for the withdrawal, that the withdrawal is the candidate’s own free act and deed, and that it is not executed as the result of any threat or promise made to the candidate. The certificate of withdrawal shall be filed in the office where the nomination papers were filed within the time prescribed by §

17-14-13

for filing objections to nomination papers; provided, that if an objection has been filed, the certificate need not be filed until twenty-four (24) hours following the decision of the state board, or of the local board, relative to the objection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 16; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-15

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 437, § 1.

17-14-16.
Certification of names of candidates to secretary of state.

Following the determination of objections, if any, to the nomination papers, the state board or local board shall immediately certify to the secretary of state the names and addresses of all candidates who have filed valid nomination papers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 15; P.L. 1948, ch. 2100, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 14; P.L. 1950, ch. 2476, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-16

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-14-17.
Replacement of deceased endorsed candidate.

When an endorsed nominee as a candidate to be voted upon at any primary has deceased prior to the holding of the primary, the committee having the original authority to endorse the candidate shall substitute as the endorsed nominee for candidate to be voted upon at the primary any person qualified to vote at the primary in the place and stead of the deceased nominee; provided, that immediately upon receipt of actual knowledge of the death of the endorsed nominee by the committee having the original authority to endorse the candidate, the committee shall make the substitution referred to in this section. The chairperson of the committee shall, immediately upon the substitution, notify the secretary of state in writing of the death of the endorsed nominee and of the substitution of a nominee as provided in this section. Any substituted nominee shall have been eligible for nomination on the dates as required by and pursuant to the requirements of §§

17-14-1

,

17-14-1

.1,

17-14-2

, and

17-14-2.1

. Upon receipt of the notice, the secretary of state shall thereupon substitute on the ballots the name of the endorsed nominee who replaces the deceased endorsed nominee as provided in this section; provided, that the written notice is received by the secretary of state at least fourteen (14) days prior to the date of the primary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1886, § 16A; P.L. 1950, ch. 2564, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-14-17

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 112, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 9; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 9.

17-14-17.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 243, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 243, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 389, § 7, effective June 1, 1988.